Washington statutes.
RCW 41.58.050

Rules and regulations.

The commission shall have authority from time to time to make, amend, and rescind, in the manner prescribed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 17; 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 16 ss 16-25: See note following RCW 41.58.060.

Transfer of powers, duties, and functions—2011 1st sp.s. c 16: See note following RCW 41.58.060.